Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.682

Energy conservation to be included in landscape objectives.

The director of the department of enterprise services shall seek to further energy conservation objectives among other landscape objectives in planting and maintaining trees upon grounds administered by the department.

[ 2015 c 225 s 68; 1993 c 204 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—1993 c 204: See note following RCW 35.92.390.